District of Columbia statutes.
38-2909

Repealed

Cost of education adjustment.

Repealed.

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-207, § 110, 45 DCR 8095
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 4002(h), 57 DCR 181
1981 Ed., § 31-2909.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-2901.
For temporary addition of chapter, see note to § 38-2901.
For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 4002(h) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-187, August 26, 2009, 56 DCR 7374).
For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 4002(h) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 4002(f) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
Section 95(a) of D.C. Law 19-171 redesignated D.C. Law 17-111, § 4002(h) as D.C. Law 18-111, § 4002(f), which did not affect the repeal of this section.